Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 12. Teen Court Program

§ 7-13-1201.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Teen Court Program”.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 58, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-13-1202(a)(v).

§ 7-13-1202.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Minor offense” means any crime punishable as a misdemeanor or the violation of any municipal ordinance, provided the maximum penalty authorized by law for the offense does not exceed imprisonment for more than six (6) months and a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00);

“Supervising court” means the municipal court or circuit court by whose order a teen court program is established pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court;

“Teen” for the purposes of this act means a person who has attained the age of thirteen (13) years of age and is under the age of majority;

“Teen court” or “teen court program” means an alternative sentencing procedure under which regular court proceedings involving a teen charged with a minor offense may be deferred and subsequently dismissed on condition that the defendant participate fully in the teen court program and appear before a jury of teen peers for sentencing and that the defendant successfully complete the terms and conditions of the sentence imposed. This sentencing is in addition to the provisions of W.S.

7-13-301

and

35-7-1037

;

“This act” means W.S.

7-13-1201

through

7-13-1205

.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 58, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), deleted “justice of the peace” following “means the municipal court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-13-1203.
Authority to establish teen court program.

The Wyoming supreme court shall adopt rules and regulations governing teen court by July 1, 1996.

In addition to any other power authorized, a municipal court judge, with the approval and consent of the governing body of the municipality, or any circuit court judge, with the approval and consent of the board of county commissioners, may by order establish a teen court program and training standards for participation in accordance with this act to provide a disposition alternative for teens charged with minor offenses.

In any case involving the commission of a minor offense by a teen defendant, the supervising court may, without entering a judgment of guilt or conviction, defer further proceedings and order the defendant to participate in a teen court program, provided:

The teen defendant, with the consent of, or in the presence of, the defendant’s parents or legal guardian, enters a plea of guilty in open court to the offense charged;

The restitution amount, if any, owed to any victim has been determined by the supervising court;

The defendant requests on the record to participate in the teen court program and agrees that deferral of further proceedings in the action filed in the supervising court is conditioned upon the defendant’s successful completion of the teen court program; and

The court determines that the defendant will benefit from participation in the teen court program.

If the supervising court determines that the teen defendant has successfully completed the teen court program, the supervising court may discharge the defendant and dismiss the proceedings against him.

If the defendant fails to successfully complete the prescribed teen court program, the supervising court shall enter an adjudication of guilt and conviction and proceed to impose sentence upon the defendant for the offense originally charged.

Discharge and dismissal under this section shall be without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction for any purpose. If the original offense charged was a traffic offense, the supreme court shall, on behalf of the circuit court and within thirty (30) days after the discharge and dismissal is entered, submit to the department of transportation an abstract of the court record compiled under W.S. 7-19-107(k). If the original offense was a traffic offense charged in municipal court, the municipal court shall, within thirty (30) days after the discharge and dismissal is entered, submit to the department of transportation an abstract of the court record compiled under W.S. 7-19-107(k). The department shall maintain abstracts received under this subsection as provided by W.S. 31-5-1214(f).

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 58, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2020 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to jurisdiction for sale of tobacco product, to a minor, see §

14-3-306

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), deleted “justice of the peace or” following “municipality, or any.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (f), added “supreme” preceding “court,” added “on behalf of the circuit court and” preceding “within thirty (30) days,” added “court” preceding “record,” and substituted “compiled under W.S. 7-19-107(k). If the original offense was a traffic offense charged in municipal court, the municipal court shall, within thirty (30) days after the discharge and dismissal is entered, submit to the department of transportation an abstract of the court record compiled under W.S. 7-19-107(k).” for “of the court evidencing the defendant's successful completion of the teen court program” following “court record.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-13-1202(a)(v).

§ 7-13-1204.
Program criteria.

A teen court program may be established under this act in accordance with the following criteria:

The judge of the teen court shall be the judge of the supervising court or an attorney admitted to practice in this state appointed by the supervising court to serve in a voluntary capacity and shall serve at the pleasure of the supervising court;

Procedures in teen court shall be established by order of the supervising court in conformance with the provisions of this act and shall be subject to any uniform procedures for teen courts as may be prescribed by the Wyoming supreme court;

The supervising court may authorize the use of its courtroom and other facilities by the teen court program during times when the courtroom and facilities are not required for the normal operations of the supervising court;

The teen defendant, as a condition of participation in the teen court program, may be required to pay a nonrefundable fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00). Fees collected under this paragraph by a municipal court shall be credited to the treasury of the municipality. Fees collected under this paragraph by a circuit court shall be credited to the treasury of the county;

The teen court program may involve teens serving as voluntary teen court members in various capacities including, but not limited to jurors, prosecutor-advocates, defender-advocates, bailiffs, clerks and supervisory duties;

Every teen defendant appearing in teen court shall be accompanied by a parent or guardian;

The teen court jury shall impose restitution, if any, in the amount established by the supervising court;

The supervisory court, in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court, shall establish a range of sentencing alternatives for any case referred to teen court. Sentencing alternatives shall include, but not be limited to:

Community service as authorized by the supervising court;

Mandatory participation in law related education classes, appropriate counseling, treatment or other education programs;

Require the teen defendant to participate as a juror or other teen court member in proceedings involving teen defendants;

Fines, not to exceed the statutory amount.

The teen court jury shall not have the power to impose a term of imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 58, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iv), deleted “justice of the peace or” following “this paragraph by a.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-13-1202(a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-13-1205.
Juvenile courts authorized to establish teen court program.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Juvenile Justice Act, W.S.

14-6-201

through

14-6-252

, a juvenile court may establish and offer a teen court program substantially complying with the provisions of this act as an alternative to any disposition authorized by W.S. 14-6-229(d), provided:

Participation in the teen court program shall be limited to teens charged under the Juvenile Justice Act with having committed a minor offense and who have been adjudicated delinquent;

The juvenile and all parties to the proceeding, including any guardian ad litem appointed in the juvenile court proceeding to represent the best interests of the juvenile, consent to the juvenile’s participation in the teen court program;

The juvenile and the juvenile’s parents or guardian waive any rights to confidentiality otherwise available under the Juvenile Justice Act; and

The juvenile court finds that participation in the teen court program would be in the best interest of the juvenile.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 58, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to sanctions for juvenile offenders, see §

14-6-247

.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “Justice” for “Court” and substituted “14-6-252” for “14-6-244” in the introductory language of (a).”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ii) and (a)(iii), substituted "Juvenile Justice Act" for "Juvenile Court Act."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-13-1202(a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

The Juvenile Court Act is now known as the Juvenile Justice Act.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”